District of Columbia statutes.
42-1012

Special powers in trust.

A special power is in trust:

(1)

When the disposition which it authorizes is limited to be made to any person or class of persons other than the grantee of such power;

(2)

When any person or class of persons other than the grantee is designated as entitled to any benefit from the disposition or change authorized by the power.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1048

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-112.
1973 Ed., § 45-1012.